Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Chapter 3

Ammunition Tax [Repealed]

70-3-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, §§ 42, 69; 1937, ch. 252, § 3; 1945, ch. 37, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.51, 5178.78 (Williams, §§ 5176.43, 5176.70); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 9; Acts 1979, ch. 179, § 1; 1982, ch. 738, § 11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-301; Acts 1989, ch. 486, § 15; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.Acts 1937, ch. 84, §§ 42-52, 68, 69, 69A; 1937, ch. 252, §§ 3-5; 1945, ch. 37, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 6, 10; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.51, 5178.53, 5178.54, 5178.55, 5178.56, 5178.57, 5178.58, 5178.59, 5178.60, 5178.61, 5178.77, 5178.78, 5178.79 (Williams, §§ 5176.43, 5176.44, 5176.45, 5176.46, 5176.47, 5176.48, 5176.49, 5176.50, 5176.51, 5176.52, 5176.53, 5176.69, 5176.70, 5176.71); Acts 1959, ch. 145, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7, 9; Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7, 21; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 42, § 1; Acts 1979, ch. 179, § 1; 1982, ch. 738, § 11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-301, 51-302, 51-303, 51-304, 51-305, 51-306, 51-307, 51-308, 51-309, 51-310, 51-311, 51-312, 51-330, 51-331, 51-332, 51-333; Acts 1989, ch. 486, § 15; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, §§ 42, 43; 1945, ch. 37, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 10; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.51, 5178.52 (Williams, §§ 5176.43, 5176.44); Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-302; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, §§ 44, 45; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.53, 5178.54 (Williams, §§ 5176.45, 5176.46); Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7, 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-303, 51-304; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, §§ 46, 47; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 6, 10; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.55, 5178.56 (Williams, §§ 5176.47, 5176.48); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; T.C.A., §§ 51-305, 51-306; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, § 69A, as added by Acts 1937, ch. 252, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 10; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.79 (Williams, § 5176.71); Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-307; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, § 49; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.58 (Williams, § 5176.50); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-308; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, § 48; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.57 (Williams, § 5176.49); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-309; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, § 48; 1937, ch. 252, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.57 (Williams, § 5176.49); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 42, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-310; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, § 50; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 10; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.59 (Williams, § 5176.51); Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-311; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-110. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, § 51; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 10; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.60 (Williams, § 5176.52); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-312; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-111. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, § 69; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 6, 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.78 (Williams, § 5176.70); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7, 9; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-330, 51-331; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-112. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, § 68; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 6, 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.77 (Williams, § 5176.69); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-332; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.

70-3-113. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 84, § 52; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.61 (Williams, § 5176.53); Acts 1959, ch. 145, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 9; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-333; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 70-3-101 — 70-3-113, concerned ammunition tax.